Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-117.06
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

Any money collected by the commission pursuant to section 53-117.05, 53-165.01, or 53-167.02 shall be credited to the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. The purpose of the fund shall be to cover any administrative costs, including salary and benefits, incurred by the commission in producing or distributing the material referred to in such sections, to provide for information technology costs of the commission, and to defray the costs associated with electronic regulatory transactions, industry education events, enforcement training, and equipment for regulatory work. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1989, LB 70, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 332, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 42;

Laws 2008, LB993, § 1;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 28;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 23;

Laws 2023, LB376, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 145.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.